Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products

438.300.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that KRS

438.305

to

438.340

shall be enforced in an equitable and uniform manner throughout the Commonwealth. For the purpose of equitable and uniform enforcement, the provisions of KRS

438.305

to

438.340

shall supersede any subsequently enacted local law, ordinance, or regulation which relates to the use, display, sale, or distribution of tobacco products. It is the intent of the Legislature that KRS 438.305 to 438.340 be enforced so as to ensure the eligibility for and receipt of any federal funds or grants that the Commonwealth of Kentucky now receives or may receive relating to the provisions of KRS 438.305 to 438.340.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 480, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 38, § 1, effective March 5, 1996.

438.305.
Definitions for KRS 438.305 to 438.340.

As used in KRS

438.305

to

438.340

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Alternative nicotine product” means a noncombustible product containing nicotine that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or ingested by any other means.

“Alternative nicotine product” does not include any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

“Manufacturer” means any person who manufactures or produces tobacco products within or without this Commonwealth;

“Nonresident wholesaler” means any person who purchases cigarettes or other tobacco products directly from the manufacturer and maintains a permanent location or locations outside this state at which Kentucky cigarette tax evidence is attached or from which Kentucky cigarette tax is reported and paid;

“Proof of age” means a driver’s license or other documentary or written evidence of an individual’s age;

“Resident wholesaler” means any person who purchases at least seventy-five percent (75%) of all cigarettes or other tobacco products purchased by that person directly from the cigarette manufacturer on which the cigarette tax provided for in KRS

138.130

to

138.205

is unpaid, and who maintains an established place of business in this state at which the person attaches cigarette tax evidence or receives untaxed cigarettes;

“Sample” means a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product distributed to members of the general public at no cost;

“Subjobber” means any person who purchases tobacco products, on which the Kentucky cigarette tax has been paid, from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to KRS

138.195

, and makes them available to a retail establishment for resale;

“Tobacco product” means any cigarette, cigar, snuff, smokeless tobacco product, smoking tobacco, chewing tobacco, and any kind or form of tobacco prepared in a manner suitable for chewing or smoking, or both, or any kind or form of tobacco that is suitable to be placed in a person’s mouth. “Tobacco product” also means any product made or derived from tobacco that is intended for human consumption, including any component, part, or accessory of a tobacco product, except for raw materials other than tobacco used in manufacturing any component, part, or accessory of a tobacco product, in accordance with the federal Tobacco Control Act, Pub. L. No. 111-31;

“Tobacco product” does not include any alternative nicotine product, vapor product, or product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; and

“Vapor product” means any noncombustible product that employs a heating element, battery, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size and including the component parts and accessories thereto, that can be used to deliver vaporized nicotine or other substances to users inhaling from the device. “Vapor product” includes but is not limited to any device deemed to be an electronic nicotine delivery system by the United States Food and Drug Administration, any electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product or device and every variation thereof, regardless of whether marketed as such, and any vapor cartridge or other container of a liquid solution or other material that is intended to be used with or in an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or other similar product or device.

“Vapor product” does not include any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 480, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 38, § 2, effective March 5, 1996; 2000, ch. 423, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 111, § 1, effective April 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 35, § 1, effective March 26, 2020.

438.310.
Sale of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to persons under age 21 prohibited — Penalty.

No person shall sell or cause to be sold any tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product at retail to any person under the age of twenty-one (21), or solicit any person under the age of twenty-one (21) to purchase any tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product at retail.

Any person who sells tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products at retail shall cause to be posted in a conspicuous place in his or her establishment a notice stating that it is illegal to sell tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to persons under age twenty-one (21).

Any person selling tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products shall require proof of age from a prospective buyer or recipient if the person has reason to believe that the prospective buyer or recipient is under the age of twenty-one (21).

A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for a first violation and a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for any subsequent violation. The fine shall be administered by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control using a civil enforcement procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 388, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 164, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 480, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 38, § 3, effective March 5, 1996; 2000, ch. 423, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1925, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 111, § 2, effective April 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 35, § 2, effective March 26, 2020.

438.311.
Unlawful acts by persons under 21 relating to purchase or receipt of tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product — Confiscation.

Except for the provisions of KRS

438.330

, it shall be unlawful for a person who has not attained the age of twenty-one (21) years to purchase or accept receipt of or to attempt to purchase or accept receipt of a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product, or to present or offer to any person any purported proof of age which is false, fraudulent, or not actually his or her own, for the purpose of purchasing or receiving any tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product. It shall not be unlawful for such a person to accept receipt of a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product from an employer when required in the performance of the person’s duties.

All peace officers with general law enforcement authority and employees of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control may confiscate the tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product of a person under the age of twenty-one (21) who has violated this section. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no other penalty shall apply to a person under the age of twenty-one (21) for a violation of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 38, § 4, effective March 5, 1996; 1998, ch. 477, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 423, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 17, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 1926, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 111, § 3, effective April 10, 2014; ch. 132, § 20, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 35, § 3, effective March 26, 2020.

438.313.
Distribution of cigarettes, tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to persons under age 21 prohibited — Penalty — Issuance of uniform citation.

No wholesaler, retailer, or manufacturer of cigarettes, tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products may distribute cigarettes, tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products, including samples thereof, free of charge or otherwise, to any person under the age of twenty-one (21).

Any person who distributes cigarettes, tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products, including samples thereof, free of charge or otherwise shall require proof of age from a prospective buyer or recipient if the person has reason to believe that the prospective purchaser or recipient is under the age of twenty-one (21).

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each offense. The fine shall be administered by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control using a civil enforcement procedure for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older.

All peace officers with general law enforcement authority and employees of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control may issue a uniform citation, but may not make an arrest, or take a child into custody, for a violation of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 164, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 1994, ch. 480, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 38, § 5, effective March 5, 1996; 1998, ch. 477, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 423, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1927, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 111, § 4, effective April 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 35, § 4, effective March 26, 2020.

438.315.
Sales of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to or purchases by persons under age 21 from vending machine prohibited — Location of vending machine — Penalty — Issuance of uniform citation.

The sale of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products dispensed through a vending machine is prohibited to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years.

The purchase of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products dispensed through a vending machine is prohibited to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years.

Except for vending machines located in factories or vending machines located in bars or taverns to which minors are not permitted access, any vending machine from which tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products are dispensed shall be located in the line of sight of the cashier for the retail establishment.

Any owner of a retail establishment violating this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. The fine shall be administered by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control using a civil enforcement procedure for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older.

All peace officers with general law enforcement authority and employees of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control may issue a uniform citation, but may not make an arrest, or take a child into custody, for a violation of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 480, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 38, § 6, effective March 5, 1996; 1998, ch. 477, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 423, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1928, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 111, § 5, effective April 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 35, § 5, effective March 26, 2020.

438.317.
Prohibitions against sale of or making available cigarettes packaged in units of fewer than twenty — Penalties.

No person shall sell or cause to be sold at retail cigarettes packaged in units of fewer than twenty (20) cigarettes.

No resident wholesaler, nonresident wholesaler, or subjobber shall make available to a retail establishment cigarettes packaged for retail sale in units of less than twenty (20) cigarettes.

Any person violating subsection (1) of this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). Any person violating subsection (2) of this section shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). These penalties shall be enforced by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control through civil enforcement procedures.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 479, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 423, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1929, effective July 15, 2010.

438.320.
Reports by wholesalers, nonresident wholesalers, and subjobbers.

Each resident wholesaler, nonresident wholesaler, or subjobber making tobacco products available to a retail establishment for sale or distribution shall report the name and address of the owner of the retail establishment to the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control in a manner specified by administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 480, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 423, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1930, effective July 15, 2010.

438.325.
Notice to employee of prohibitions — Penalty.

Each owner of a retail establishment selling or distributing tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products shall notify each individual employed in the retail establishment as a retail sales clerk that the sale of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years and the purchase of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products by any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years are prohibited.

Each owner of a retail establishment selling or distributing tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products shall notify each individual employed in the retail establishment as a retail sales clerk that proof of age is required from a prospective buyer or recipient if the person has reason to believe that the prospective purchaser or recipient is under the age of twenty-one (21).

The notice to employees that is required in subsection (1) of this section shall be provided before the person commences work as a retail sales clerk, or, in the case of a person employed as a retail sales clerk on March 26, 2020, within thirty (30) days of that date. The employee shall signify receipt of the notice required by this section by signing a form that states as follows:

“I understand that under the law of the Commonwealth of Kentucky it is illegal to sell or distribute tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years and that it is illegal for persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years to purchase tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.”

The owner of the retail establishment shall maintain the signed notice that is required pursuant to subsection (3) of this section in a place and in a manner so as to be easily accessible to any employee of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control or the Department of Agriculture conducting an inspection of the retail establishment for the purpose of monitoring compliance in limiting the sale or distribution of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to persons under the age of twenty-one (21) as provided in KRS

438.305

to

438.340

.

Any owner of the retail establishment violating subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. The fine shall be administered by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control in a civil enforcement procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 480, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 38, § 7, effective March 5, 1996; 2000, ch. 423, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1931, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 111, § 6, effective April 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 35, § 6, effective March 26, 2020.

438.330.
Random inspections of retail establishment selling or distributing tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products — Preparation of federally required annual report.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control and the Department of Agriculture shall carry out annually conducted random, unannounced inspections of retail establishments where tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products are sold or distributed for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of KRS

438.305

to

438.340

. The inspections shall be conducted to the extent necessary to assure that the Commonwealth remains in compliance with Public Law 102-321 and applicable federal regulations. The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control and the Department of Agriculture shall also ensure that targeted inspections are conducted at those retail establishments where, and at those times when, persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years are most likely to purchase tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products. Persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years may be used to test compliance with the provisions of KRS

438.305

to

438.340

only if the testing is conducted under the direct supervision of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, sheriff, or chief of police, or their employees, and written parental consent has been obtained. The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall prepare annually, for submission by the Governor to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the report required by Section 1926 of Subpart 1 of Part B of Title XIX of the Federal Public Health Service Act.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall develop and implement the survey sampling methodologies to carry out the inspections as described in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 480, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 423, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1932, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 111, § 7, effective April 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 35, § 7, effective March 26, 2020.

438.335.
Enforcement by Department of Agriculture — Retention of percentage of per pack revenue and fines.

The Department of Agriculture shall carry out the provisions of KRS

438.305

to

438.340

as they relate to educating the public and sellers of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products about provisions and penalties of KRS

438.305

to

438.340

. The Department of Agriculture shall be entitled to the revenue produced by one-twentieth of one cent ($0.0005) of the three-cent ($0.03) per pack revenue collected by the Department of Revenue from the state excise tax on the sale of cigarettes as imposed by KRS

138.140

and to keep fifty percent (50%) of any fines collected under KRS 438.305 to 438.340 to offset the costs of these education efforts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 480, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 38, § 8, effective March 5, 1996; 1998, ch. 477, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 423, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 697, effective June 20, 2005; 2014, ch. 111, § 8, effective April 10, 2014.

438.337.
Responsibilities of Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control in enforcement of KRS 438.305 to 438.340 — Disposition of revenue and fines collected under KRS 138.140 and KRS 438.305 to 438.340 — Statistics — Enforcement plan.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall carry out the enforcement provisions of KRS

438.305

to

438.340

.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall be entitled to the revenue produced by one-twentieth of one cent ($0.0005) of the three-cent ($0.03) per pack revenue collected by the Finance and Administration Cabinet from the state excise tax on the sale of cigarettes as imposed by KRS

138.140

to be deposited in a trust and agency account created in the State Treasury, and to keep fifty percent (50%) of any fines collected under KRS

438.305

to

438.340

to offset the costs of enforcement of KRS

438.305

to

438.340

.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall be responsible for maintaining statistics for compilation of required reports to be submitted to the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall devise a plan and time frame for enforcement to determine by random inspection if the percentage of retailers or distributors making illegal sales to persons under the age of twenty-one (21) does or does not exceed federal guidelines preventing tobacco sales to persons under the age of twenty-one (21).

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 423, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1933, effective July 15, 2010; 2020 ch. 35, § 8, effective March 26, 2020.

438.340.
Authority for administrative regulations.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control and the Department of Agriculture are authorized to promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to implement and carry out the provisions of KRS

438.305

to

438.340

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 480, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 423, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 1934, effective July 15, 2010.

438.345.
Use of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor products on school property and during school activities — Written policies — Penalties — Board may opt out.

As used in this section:

“Alternative nicotine product” has the same meaning as in KRS

438.305

;

“Tobacco product” has the same meaning as in KRS

438.305

; and

“Vapor product” has the same meaning as in KRS 438.305.

The use of any tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product:

Shall be prohibited for all persons and at all times on or in all property, including any vehicle, that is owned, operated, leased, or contracted for use by a local board of education;

Shall be prohibited for all students while attending or participating in any school-related student trip or student activity; and

Is prohibited for school district employees, volunteers, and all other individuals affiliated with a school while the user is attending or participating in any school-related student trip or student activity and is in the presence of a student or students.

On or before July 1, 2020, each local board of education shall implement this section by adopting written policies that prohibit the use of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor products pursuant to this section. The policies shall provide for:

Adequate notice regarding the policy to be provided to students, parents and guardians, school employees, and the general public;

A requirement to post signage on or in all property, including any vehicle, that is owned, operated, leased, or contracted for use by a local board of education, clearly stating that use of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor products is prohibited at all times and by all persons on or in the property; and

A requirement that school employees enforce the policies.

A person in violation of subsection (2) of this section, or policies adopted by a local board of education pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, shall be subject to penalties as set forth by the local board of education.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to:

Permit use of a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product, where it is otherwise restricted by this section, other state or federal law, administrative regulation, or executive order;

Prevent a local board of education or any other local governmental entity from adopting local ordinances, regulations, or policies relating to use of a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or a vapor product, in public places of employment, and nonenclosed areas, that are more restrictive than what is provided for in this section; or

Repeal any existing local ordinances, regulations, or policies that provide restrictions on the use of a tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product, in addition to those provided for in this section.

Each local board of education may choose, up to three (3) years after June 27, 2019, to opt out of subsections (2) to (4) of this section.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 198, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

438.350.
Prohibition against possession or use of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products by persons under 21 — Exceptions.

No person under the age of twenty-one (21) shall possess or use tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.

Any tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product found in the possession of a person under the age of twenty-one (21) and in plain view of the law enforcement officer shall be confiscated by the law enforcement officer making the charge.

This section shall not apply to persons exempted as provided by KRS

438.311

and

438.330

.

The terms “alternative nicotine product,” “tobacco product,” and “vapor product,” shall have the same meanings as in KRS

438.305

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 160, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 111, § 9, effective April 10, 2014; 2020 ch. 35, § 9, effective March 26, 2020.